Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 41. Seed Potatoes.

§§ 3.2-4100 through 3.2-4111.

Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 23.

Cross references.

For current provisions pertaining to seed potato standards, see
Article 3 (§

3.2-1816

et seq.) of Chapter 18.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 24 provides: “That all regulations, rules, and standards adopted by the Seed Potato Board pursuant to Chapter 41 (§

3.2-4100

et seq.) of Title 3.2 of the Code of Virginia that are in effect as of July 1, 2012, shall be administered by the Potato Board and shall remain in full force and effect until the Potato Board adopts regulations pursuant to the 22nd enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 26 provides: “That the terms of the members of the Seed Potato Board shall expire on July 1, 2012.”

Former §

3.2-4100

, pertaining to definitions, derived from Code 1950, § 3-228.3; 1950, p. 1029; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-287; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-4101, pertaining to the Seed Potato Board; purpose, derived from 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-4102, pertaining to membership; terms; quorum; meetings, derived from Code 1950, § 3-228.6; 1950, p. 1029; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-290; 1972, c. 98; 1978, c. 540; 1985, c. 448; 2001, c. 322; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-4103, pertaining to compensation and expenses, derived from 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-4104, pertaining to the powers and duties of the Seed Potato Board, derived from Code 1950, §§ 3-228.5, 3-228.6; 1950, p. 1029; 1966, cc. 686, 702, §§ 3.1-289, 3.1-290; 1972, c. 98; 1978, c. 540; 1985, c. 448; 2001, c. 322; 2008, c. 860; 2009, c. 107. Former § 3.2-4105, pertaining to standards required of seed potatoes, derived from Code 1950, § 3-228.4; 1950, p. 1029; 1958, c. 94; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-288; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-4106, pertaining to exempted sales, derived from Code 1950, § 3-228.10; 1950, p. 1030; 1958, c. 94; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-294; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-4107, pertaining to inspection of potatoes; right of entry; fees; records required, derived from Code 1950, § 3-228.8; 1950, p. 1030; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-292; 1978, c. 540; 1980, c. 308; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-4108, pertaining to “Stop sale” order; seizure; condemnation, derived from Code 1950, § 3-228.8; 1950, p. 1030; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-292; 1978, c. 540; 1980, c. 308; 2008, c. 860.
Former § 3.2-4109, pertaining to authority of Commissioner to permit sale of substandard potatoes and experimental varieties, derived from Code 1950, § 3-228.9; 1950, p. 1030; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-293; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-4110, pertaining to notice and hearings, derived from Code 1950, § 3-228.11; 1950, p. 1030; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-295; 1978, c. 540; 2008, c. 860. Former
§ 3.2-4111, pertaining to penalties, derived from Code 1950, § 3-228.11; 1950, p. 1030; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-295; 1978, c. 540; 2008, c. 860.